test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-laaha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - laahâ: # â-stems
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laahâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: laavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahhân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahhâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: laavâi
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: lavâiguin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavâittáá
